Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Part 5 Membership
43-38-524. Written member control agreements.

A written agreement among persons who are then members, including a sole member, or who have signed subscription or contribution agreements, relating to the control of any phase of the business and affairs of the cooperative, its liquidation, dissolution and termination, or the relations among members or persons who have signed subscription or contribution agreements is valid as provided in subsection (b). Wherever this chapter provides that a particular result may or must be obtained through a provision in the articles of organization or bylaws, the same result can be accomplished through a member control agreement valid under this section or through a procedure established by a member control agreement valid under this section.

Other than patron member voting control under § 43-38-522 and patron member allocation and distribution provisions under §§ 43-38-901 and 43-38-902, a written agreement among persons described in subsection (a) that relates to the control of or the liquidation, dissolution and termination of the cooperative, the relations among them, or any phase of the business and affairs of the cooperative, including, without limitation, the management of its business, the declaration and payment of distributions, the sharing of profits and losses, the election of directors, the employment of members by the cooperative, or the arbitration of disputes, is valid, if the agreement is signed by all persons who are then the members of the cooperative, whether or not the members all have voting power, and all those who have signed contribution agreements, regardless of whether those signatories will, when members, have voting power.

This section does not apply to, limit, or restrict agreements otherwise valid, nor is the procedure set forth in this section the exclusive method of agreement among members or between the members and the cooperative with respect to any of the matters described.

Any assignee of any member's financial rights may not be a party to an agreement under subsection (a), unless that assignee is also a member or person or entity bound by a binding contribution agreement at the time the agreement is entered into.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles, bylaws or the member control agreement, the member control agreement will not terminate if the cooperative is combined into a new cooperative pursuant to merger, whether by a merger in dissolution or otherwise. Any other termination of the cooperative's existence will automatically terminate the member control agreement.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 22.

43-38-525. Representative of the cooperative at meetings of cooperative owned business entities.

A cooperative that holds ownership interests of another business entity may, by direction of the cooperative's board, elect or appoint a person to represent the cooperative at a meeting of the business entity. The representative has authority to represent the cooperative and may cast the cooperative's vote at the business entity's meeting.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 22.

43-38-526. Determination of the owners of membership interests.

The articles or bylaws may fix a “record date” for the determination of the owners of membership interests entitled to notice of and entitled to vote at a meeting, to demand a meeting, to vote or to take any other action. When a date is so fixed, only members on that date are entitled to notice of and permitted to vote at that meeting of members or to take any other action on the subject of this notice. If no date is so fixed, the record date is the close of business the business day before the first notice is sent.

The secretary of the cooperative shall prepare a list of the names of all members who are entitled to vote at the meeting of the members and show the address of and membership interest or interests held by each member as reflected in the records of the cooperative.

The list must be available for inspection and copying by any member, beginning two (2) business days after notice of the meeting is given for which the list was prepared and continuing through the meeting, at the cooperative's principal executive office or at a place identified in the meeting notice in the city where the meeting will be held. A violation of this subsection (c) entitles any member seeking to inspect the list to equitable relief under § 43-38-705.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 22.

43-38-527. Grouping of members.

A cooperative may group members and patron members into districts, units or another basis, if and as authorized in its articles and bylaws, which may include authorization for the board to determine the groupings.

The board may do things necessary to implement the use of districts or units, including setting the time and place and prescribing the rules of conduct for holding meetings by districts or units to elect delegates to members' meetings.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 22.

43-38-528. Violations of articles, bylaws, member control agreements or marketing contracts — Surrender of financial rights — Surrender of voting rights.

A member who knowingly, intentionally, or repeatedly violates a provision of the articles, bylaws, member control agreement or marketing contract with the cooperative, may be required by the board to surrender the financial rights of membership interest of any class owned by the member.

The cooperative shall refund to the member for the surrendered financial rights of membership interest the lesser of the book value or market value of the financial right of the membership interest payable in not more than seven (7) years from the date of surrender, or the board may transfer all of any patron member's financial rights to a class of financial rights held by members who are not patron members, or to a certificate of interest that carries liquidation rights on par with membership interests and is redeemed within seven (7) years after the transfer as provided in the certificate.

Membership interests required to be surrendered may be reissued or retired and cancelled by the board.

A member who knowingly, intentionally or repeatedly violates a provision of the articles, bylaws, member control agreement, or a marketing contract, may be required by the board to surrender voting power in the cooperative.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 22.

43-38-529. Member liability.

A member is not, merely on account of that status, personally liable for the acts, debts, liabilities, or obligations of a cooperative. A member is liable for any unpaid subscription for the membership interest, unpaid membership fees, or a debt for which the member has separately contracted with the cooperative.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 22.

43-38-530. Inspection and copying of records by members.

A member of the cooperative is entitled to inspect and copy, during regular business hours at the cooperative's principal executive office, any of the records of the cooperative described in § 43-38-118, if the member gives the cooperative written notice of the demand at least five (5) business days before the date on which the member wishes to inspect and copy.

The right of inspection granted by this section may not be abolished or limited by a cooperative's articles or bylaws.

This section does not affect:

The right of a member to inspect records, if the member is in litigation with the cooperative, to the same extent as any other litigant; or

The power of a court to compel the production of records for examination.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 23.

43-38-531. Inspection and copying of records by member's agent or attorney.

A member's agent or attorney has the same inspection and copying rights as the member the agent or attorney represents.

The right to copy records under § 43-38-530 includes, if reasonable, the right to receive copies made by photographic, xerographic, or other means.

The cooperative may impose a reasonable charge, covering the costs of labor and material, for copies of any documents provided to the member. The charge may not exceed the estimated cost of production or reproduction of the records.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 23.

43-38-532. Enforcement of right to inspect and copy records.

If a cooperative does not allow a member who complies with § 43-38-530(a) to inspect and copy any records required by that subsection to be available for inspection, a court in the county where the cooperative's principal executive office, or, if none in this state, its registered office, is located may summarily order inspection and copying of the records demanded at the cooperative's expense upon application of the member.

If the court orders inspection and copying of the records demanded, it shall also order the cooperative to pay the member's costs, including reasonable counsel fees, incurred to obtain the order, if the member proves that the cooperative refused inspection without a reasonable basis for doubt about the right of the member to inspect the records demanded.

If the court orders inspection and copying of the records demanded, it may impose reasonable restrictions on the use or distribution of the records by the demanding member.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 23.